Illinois, session 104th, SB3962.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 2105-379 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-379 new)8    Sec. 2105-379. Sangamon County fair lending practices 9study.10    (a) The Department, in consultation with the Sangamon 11County Board and the City of Springfield, shall conduct a 12study on the lending practices and borrower outcomes within 13Sangamon County and analyze any information collected in 14connection with that study. The purpose of this study is to 15increase transparency in financial markets, reduce disparities 16in credit access, and promote accountability through the 17regular publication of lending and borrower data for Sangamon 18County.19    (b) The study shall encompass all financial institutions 20and lending entities licensed or regulated by the Department 21that operate within Sangamon County or are municipally 22authorized by the City of Springfield, including banks, credit 23unions, mortgage companies, installment lenders, and   SB3962- 2 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1alternative financial service providers.2    (c) As part of the study, the Department shall collect, 3compile, and analyze anonymized data sets of:4        (1) the average annual percentage rate by loan type 5    and institution;6        (2) the average loan size, term, and repayment 7    duration;8        (3) default and delinquency rates, including 9    charge-offs and recovery outcomes;10        (4) borrower income brackets and ranges;11        (5) geographic distribution of loans by zip code, 12    census tract, and ward; and13        (6) aggregate number of active lenders and loan 14    volumes within each regulatory category. All data sets 15    shall undergo statistical disclosure limitation and 16    de-identification procedures, including small-cell 17    suppression for any reporting category representing fewer 18    than 5 loans or borrowers.19    (d) The study shall include, but need not be limited to:20        (1) countywide, zip code, and ward-level summaries of 21    lending trends;22        (2) year-over-year comparisons highlighting changes in 23    average annual percentage rate, loan volume, and default 24    rates;25        (3) analysis of disparities by geography, borrower 26    income, and product type; and  SB3962- 3 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1        (4) policy recommendations for equitable credit access 2    and consumer protection.3    (e) The Department may collaborate with local 4universities, financial researchers, and advocacy 5organizations to analyze the data and publish independent 6reviews.7    (f) The Department may complete a preliminary report that 8may be made available for public inspection through electronic 9means prior to the publication of the final report under this 10Section. The Department shall complete and submit the final 11report under this Section to the Governor and the General 12Assembly by December 31, 2028. A copy of both the preliminary 13report, if made available by the Department, and the final 14report shall be made available to the public through 15electronic means.16    (g) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2029. 17    Section 10. The Department of Transportation Law of the 18Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 19Section 2705-570 as follows: 20    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-570 new)21    Sec. 2705-570. Sangamon County fair transit study. 22    (a) The Department, in consultation with the Sangamon 23County Board, the Sangamon Mass Transit District, 24Springfield-Sangamon County Regional Planning Commission, and   SB3962- 4 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1relevant municipal bodies, shall conduct a countywide transit 2equity analysis study and analyze any information collected in 3connection with that study. The purpose of this study is to 4eliminate transportation disparities and promote equitable 5access for all residents.6    (b) The study shall include, but need not be limited to, 7the following:8        (1) mapping current service coverage, ridership data, 9    and demographic trends;10        (2) evaluating current transit infrastructure and 11    accessibility, including accessible shelters, lighting, 12    benches, and sidewalk connectivity, real-time route and 13    language-access displays, ADA-compliant curb and ramp 14    redesigns, public safety features such as cameras and 15    lighting and recommending improvements to transit 16    infrastructure and accessibility;17        (3) identifying gaps in service for low-income, 18    east-side, and rural residents;19        (4) evaluating language-access equity in transit 20    materials, signage, and communication; and21        (5) recommending data-driven improvements to ensure 22    equitable access across all neighborhoods.23    (c) The Department may complete a preliminary report that 24may be made available for public inspection through electronic 25means prior to the publication of the final report under this 26Section. The Department shall complete and submit the final   SB3962- 5 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1report under this Section to the Governor and the General 2Assembly by December 31, 2028. A copy of both the preliminary 3report, if made available by the Department, and the final 4report shall be made available to the public through 5electronic means.6    (d) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2029. 7    Section 15. The Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act 8is amended by adding Section 52 as follows: 9    (310 ILCS 67/52 new)10    Sec. 52. Sangamon County affordable housing study.11    (a) The Illinois Housing Development Authority, in 12consultation with the Sangamon County Board and the City of 13Springfield Office of Planning and Economic Development, shall 14conduct a countywide housing and community revitalization 15study and analyze any information collected in connection with 16that study. The purpose of this study is to promote equitable 17housing and community revitalization.18    (b) The study shall include, but need not be limited to, 19the following:20        (1) identifying historically excluded or disinvested 21    neighborhoods in need of targeted housing and 22    infrastructure investment;23        (2) assessing current affordable-housing stock, 24    vacancy rates, and ownership disparities by race and   SB3962- 6 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1    income;2        (3) prioritizing mixed-income and mixed-use 3    development that enhances accessibility and local economic 4    vitality;5        (4) qualifying for competitive State and federal 6    funding;7        (5) establishing incentives to create more affordable 8    housing, including, but not limited to, property-tax 9    abatements tied to affordability covenants, priority 10    permitting for developments meeting equity and inclusion 11    benchmarks, low-interest loans or revolving funds for 12    rehabilitation of vacant properties, and grants for the 13    inclusion of accessible, ADA-compliant design in new 14    developments; and15        (6) evaluating homeownership and renter transition 16    programs, including down-payment and credit-readiness 17    support for first-time buyers, rehabilitation financing 18    assistance for families purchasing in disinvested areas, 19    and wraparound services for financial literacy, mortgage 20    counseling, and post-purchase support.21    (c) The Department may complete a preliminary report that 22may be made available for public inspection through electronic 23means prior to the publication of the final report under this 24Section. The Department shall complete and submit the final 25report under this Section to the Governor and the General 26Assembly by December 31, 2028. A copy of both the preliminary   SB3962- 7 -LRB104 19796 BAB 33246 b1report, if made available by the Department, and the final 2report shall be made available to the public through 3electronic means.4    (d) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2029.